Utah statutes.
32B-12-204.   Specific qualifications for liquor warehousing license.

(1)  The commission may not issue a liquor warehousing license to a person who is disqualified under Section 32B-1-304.

(2)  A person, through its staff, or otherwise, either directly or indirectly, may not hold at the same time both a liquor warehousing license and another kind of package agency, license, or permit issued under this title except:

(a)  a temporary beer event permit;

(b)  a manufacturing license issued in accordance with Chapter 11, Manufacturing and Related Licenses Act; or

(c)  a beer wholesaling license issued in accordance with this chapter.

(3)  If a person to whom a liquor warehousing license is issued under this chapter no longer possesses the qualifications required by this title for obtaining that liquor warehousing license, the commission may suspend or revoke that liquor warehousing license.

